Hawaii statutes.
[§171-143] Rate policy. The board may:

(1) Charge fees to eligible lessees of public lands
within industrial parks in an amount sufficient to cover the costs of
operation, maintenance, and debt service on revenue bonds and reasonable
reserves, in compliance with part III of chapter 39; and

(2) Charge eligible lessees as may be necessary to
cover capital costs or other costs incurred in connection with the industrial
parks. [L 1994, c 162, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next